Massachusetts, session 194th, S1863.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 2A of chapter 124 of the acts of 1953, as inserted by chapter 260 of the acts of
1987, is hereby amended by inserting after the words "assistant criminal identification officer
employed by the county of Barnstable" the following words:- or the county of Plymouth.
of 1